Ohio, session 136, HB10.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Ohio: Section 1. That sections 909.07, 921.01, 921.06, 921.11, 921.16, 921.24, 943.26, 3314.03, 3326.11, 3328.24, 3701.132, and 3715.60 be amended and sections 3313.8110, 3345.88, 3715.601, 3715.602, 3715.603, 3715.604, 3715.605, and 5101.5410 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 909.07. The board of county commissioners may appoint, with the consent and concurrence of the director of agriculture, a deputy apiaristapiarists. Except as otherwise specified in this section, a deputy serves at the pleasure of the applicable board of county commissioners. A deputy apiarist shall be paid a salary as the board of county commissioners determines for inspection work and other expenses as are necessarily incurred directly related to inspection work. Before the board approves the salary and expenses for payment, the a deputy apiarist shall submit the same to the director for review. A deputy apiarist shall work under the direction of the director and shall be responsible for the inspection of apiaries in assigned counties prescribed by the department of agriculture and for the administration and enforcement of this chapter. The director may terminate the appointment of any deputy apiarist if there is evidence that the deputy has been unethical, negligent, incompetent, inefficient, or untrustworthy in the discharge of official duties. A deputy apiarist shall furnish to the director reports as are required by the director. Sec. 921.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Active ingredient" means any ingredient that will prevent, destroy, kill, repel, control, or mitigate any pest, or that will act as a plant regulator, defoliant, or desiccant. (B) "Adulterated" shall apply to any pesticide if its strength or purity is less than or greater than the professed standard or quality as expressed on its labeling or under which it is sold, if any substance has been substituted wholly or in part for the pesticide, or if any valuable constituent of the pesticide has been wholly or in part abstracted. (C) "Agricultural commodity" means any plant or part thereof or animal or animal product, produced for commercial use by a person, including farmers, ranchers, vineyardists, plant propagators, Christmas tree growers, aquaculturists, floriculturists, orchardists, foresters, or other comparable persons, primarily for the sale, consumption, propagation, or other use, by humans or animals. (D) "Aircraft" means any device used or designed for navigation or flight in the air, except a parachute or other device used primarily as safety equipment. (E) "Animal" means all vertebrate and invertebrate species, including, but not limited to, humans and other mammals, birds, fish, and shellfish. (F) "Authorized diagnostic inspection" means a diagnostic inspection conducted by a commercial applicator in the pesticide-use category in which the commercial applicator is licensed under this chapter. (G) "Beneficial insects" means those insects that, during their life cycle, are effective pollinators of plants, are parasites or predators of pests, or are otherwise beneficial. (H) "Brand" means any word, name, symbol, device, or combination thereof, that serves to distinguish the pesticide manufactured or distributed by one person from that manufactured or distributed by any other person. (I) "Pesticide applicator" means a commercial applicator or a private applicator. (J) "Private applicator" means an individual who is licensed under section 921.11 of the Revised Code. (K) "Commercial applicator" means an individual who is licensed under section 921.06 of the Revised Code to apply pesticides or to conduct authorized diagnostic inspections. (L) "Competent" means properly qualified as evidenced by passing the general examination and each applicable pesticide-use category examination for the pesticide-use categories in which a person applies pesticides and, in the case of a person who is a commercial applicator, conducts diagnostic inspections and by meeting any other criteria established by rule. (M) "Federal act" means the "Federal Insecticide, Fungicide and Rodenticide Act," 61 Stat. 163 (1947), 7 U.S.C.A. 136, as amended. (N) "Defoliant" means any substance or mixture of substances intended for causing the leaves or foliage to drop from a plant, with or without causing abscission. (O) "Desiccant" means any substance or mixture of substances intended for artificially accelerating the drying of plant tissue. (P) "Device" means any instrument or contrivance, other than a firearm, that is intended for trapping, destroying, repelling, or mitigating any pest or any other form of plant or animal life, other than human beings and other than bacteria, virus, or other microorganism on or in living human beings or other living animals. "Device" does not include equipment used for the application of pesticides when sold separately therefrom. (Q) "Direct supervision" means, unless any of the following, as applicable: (1) Unless otherwise prescribed by its labeling, a restricted use pesticide is considered to be applied under the direct supervision of a commercial applicator, if it is applied by a trained serviceperson who is trained in accordance with standards prescribed by the director under section 921.16 of the Revised Code and who is acting under the instructions and control of a commercial applicator. (2) Unless otherwise prescribed by its labeling, a general use pesticide is considered to be applied under the direct supervision of a commercial applicator, if it is applied by a trained serviceperson acting under the instructions and control of a commercial applicator. (3) Unless otherwise prescribed by its labeling, a restricted use pesticide is considered to be used under the direct supervision of a private applicator if all of the following apply: (a) The restricted use pesticide is used by an immediate family member or a subordinate employee of that private applicator. (b) The immediate family member or a subordinate employee of that private applicator is trained in accordance with standards prescribed by the director of agriculture under section 921.16 of the Revised Code and is acting under the instructions and control of the private applicator. (c) The private applicator is responsible for the actions of that immediate family member or subordinate employee and is available when needed, even though the private applicator is not physically present at the time and place the restricted use pesticide use is occurring. (R) "Directly supervise" means providing direct supervision under division (Q)(Q)(1), (2), or (3) of this section, as applicable. (S) "Distribute" means to offer or hold for sale, sell, barter, ship, deliver for shipment, or receive and, having so received, to deliver or offer to deliver, pesticides in this state. "Distribute" does not mean to hold for use, apply, or use pesticides or dilutions of pesticides, except when a pesticide dealer holds for use, applies, or uses pesticides or dilutions of pesticides in the course of business with a commercial applicator who is employed by that pesticide dealer. (T) "Environment" includes water, air, land, and all plants and human beings and other animals living therein, and the interrelationships that exist among them. (U) "Fungus" means any nonchlorophyll-bearing thallophyte, which is any nonchlorophyll-bearing plant of a lower order than mosses and liverworts, as for example, rust, smut, mildew, mold, yeast, and bacteria, except those on or in living human beings or other animals, or processed food, beverages, or pharmaceuticals. (V) "General use pesticide" means a pesticide that is classified for general use under the federal act. (W) "Ground equipment" means any device, other than aircraft, used on land or water to apply pesticides in any form. (X) "Incidental use" or "incidentally use" means the application of a general use pesticide on an occasional, isolated, site-specific basis in order to avoid immediate personal harm. "Incidental use" or "incidentally use" does not mean regular, routine, or maintenance application of a general use pesticide. (Y) "Inert ingredient" means an ingredient that is not active. (Z) "Ingredient statement" means a statement of the name and percentage of each active ingredient, together with the total percentage of inert ingredients. When the pesticide contains arsenic in any form, the ingredient statement shall include percentages of total and water soluble arsenic, each calculated as elemental arsenic. (AA) "Insect" means any of the numerous small invertebrate animals generally having the body more or less obviously segmented, for the most part belonging to the class insecta, including, but not limited to, beetles, bugs, bees, and flies, and to other allied classes of arthropods, including, but not limited to, spiders, mites, ticks, centipedes, and wood lice. (BB) "Integrated pest management" means a sustainable approach to managing pests by combining biological, cultural, physical, and chemical tools in a way that minimizes economic, health, and environmental risks. (CC) "Label" means the written, printed, or graphic matter on, or attached to the pesticide or device, or any of its containers or wrappers. (DD) "Labeling" means all labels and other written, printed, or graphic matter: (1) Accompanying the pesticide product or device at any time; (2) To which reference is made on the label or in literature accompanying the pesticide product or device, except when accurate, nonmisleading reference is made to current official publications of the United States environmental protection agency, the United States department of agriculture or interior, the United States department of health and human services, state experiment stations, state agricultural colleges, or other similar federal or state institutions or official agencies, authorized by law to conduct research in the field of pesticides; (3) Including all brochures, technical and sales bulletins, and all advertising material. (EE) "Licensure" includes certification as used in the federal act. (FF) "Misbranded" applies, if the conditions of either division (FF)(1) or (2) of this section are satisfied as follows: (1) To any pesticide or device, if at least one of the following occurs: (a) Its labeling bears any statement, design, or graphic representation relative thereto or to its ingredients that is false or misleading in any particular. (b) It is an imitation of or is distributed under the name of another pesticide or device. (c) Any word, statement, or other information required to appear on the label or labeling is not prominently placed thereon with such conspicuousness, as compared with other words, statements, designs, or graphic matter in the labeling, and in such terms as to render it likely to be read and understood by the ordinary individual under customary conditions of purchase and use. (2) To any pesticide, if at least one of the following occurs: (a) The labeling of a restricted use pesticide does not contain a statement that it is a restricted use pesticide. (b) The labeling accompanying it does not contain directions for use that are necessary for effecting the purpose for which the pesticide is intended and, if complied with, together with any requirements imposed by the federal act, that are adequate to protect the environment. (c) The label does not bear all of the following: (i) The name, brand, or trademark under which the pesticide is distributed; (ii) An ingredient statement on the part of the immediate container and on the outside container and wrapper of the retail package, if any, through which the ingredient statement on the immediate container cannot be clearly read, which is presented or displayed under customary conditions of purchase, provided that the ingredient statement may appear prominently on another part of the container as permitted by the amended federal act or by the director; (iii) A warning or caution statement that may be necessary and that, if complied with together with any requirement imposed under the federal act, would be adequate to protect the environment; (iv) The net weight or measure of the contents, subject to such reasonable variations as the administrator of the United States environmental protection agency or the director of agriculture may permit; (v) The name and address of the manufacturer, registrant, or person for whom manufactured; (vi) The United States environmental protection agency registration number assigned to each establishment in which the pesticide was produced and the agency registration number assigned to it, as required by regulations under the federal act. (d) The pesticide contains any substance or substances in quantities highly toxic to human beings unless the label bears, in addition to other label requirements, all of the following: (i) The skull and crossbones; (ii) The word "poison" in red prominently displayed on a background of distinctly contrasting color; (iii) A statement of an antidote or a practical or emergency medical treatment, first aid or otherwise, in case of poisoning by the pesticide. (e) It is contained in a package or other container or wrapping that does not conform to the standard established by the administrator of the United States environmental protection agency. (GG) "Nematodes" means invertebrate animals of the phylum nemathelminthes and class nematoda, which are unsegmented, round worms with elongated, fusiform, or sac-like bodies covered with cuticle, and that inhabit soil, water, plants, or plant parts and also may be called nema or eel-worms. (HH) "Pest" means a harmful, destructive, or nuisance insect, fungus, rodent, nematode, bacterium, bird, snail, weed, or parasitic plant or a harmful or destructive form of plant or animal life or virus, or any plant or animal species that the director declares to be a pest, except viruses, bacteria, or other microorganisms on or in living animals, including human beings. (II) "Pesticide" means any substance or mixture of substances intended for either of the following: (1) Preventing, destroying, repelling, or mitigating any pest; (2) Use as a plant regulator, defoliant, or desiccant. "Pesticide" includes a pest monitoring system designated by rule. (JJ) "Pesticide dealer" means any person who distributes restricted use pesticides or pesticides whose uses or distribution are further restricted by the director to the ultimate user or to a commercial applicator who is employed by that pesticide dealer. (KK) "Pesticide business" means a person who performs pesticide business activities. (LL) "Pesticide business activities" means any of the following: (1) The application of pesticides to the property of another for hire; (2) The solicitation to apply pesticides; (3) The conducting of authorized diagnostic inspections. (MM) "Pesticide-use category" means a specialized field of pesticide application or of diagnostic inspection as defined by rule. (NN) "Plant regulator" means any substance or mixture of substances, intended, through physiological action, for accelerating or retarding the growth or rate of maturation, or for otherwise altering the behavior of plants or the produce thereof, but does not include substances to the extent that they are intended as plant nutrients, trace elements, nutritional chemicals, plant inoculants, or soil amendments. (OO) "Product name" means a coined or specific designation applied to an individual pesticide of a fixed combination and derivation. (PP) "Registrant" means a person who has registered a pesticide under this chapter. (QQ) "Restricted use pesticide" means any pesticide or pesticide use classified by the administrator of the United States environmental protection agency for use only by a pesticide applicator or by an individual who is trained in accordance with standards prescribed by the director under section 921.16 of the Revised Code and who is working under the direct supervision of a pesticide applicator. (RR) "Rule" means a rule adopted under section 921.16 of the Revised Code. (SS) "Sell or sale" means exchange of ownership or transfer of custody. (TT) "State restricted use pesticide" means any pesticide or pesticides classified by the director subsequent to a hearing held in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code for use only by pesticide applicators or individuals who are trained in accordance with standards prescribed by the director under section 921.16 of the Revised Code and who are working under their direct supervision. (UU) "Unreasonable adverse effects on the environment" means any unreasonable risk to human beings or the environment taking into account the economic, social, and environmental benefits and costs of the use of any pesticide. (VV) "Trained serviceperson" means an employee of a pesticide business, other business, agency of the United States government, state agency, or political subdivision who has been trained to apply general use do either of the following: (1) Apply pesticides while under the direct supervision of a commercial applicator; (2) Use restricted use pesticides after being trained in accordance with standards prescribed by the director under section 921.16 of the Revised Code and while working under the direct supervision of a commercial applicator. (WW) "Weed" means any plant that grows where not wanted. (XX) "Wildlife" means all living things that are neither human, domesticated, or pests, including, but not limited to, mammals, birds, and aquatic life. (YY) "Trade secret" and "confidential business information" mean any formula, plan, pattern, process, tool, mechanism, compound, procedure, production date, or compilation of information that is not patented, that is known only to certain individuals within a commercial concern, and that gives its user an opportunity to obtain a business advantage over competitors who do not know or use it. (ZZ) "Immediate family" means familial relationships limited to a person's spouse, parents, stepparents, foster parents, father-in-law, mother-in-law, children, stepchildren, foster children, sons-in-law, daughters-in-law, grandparents, grandchildren, brothers, sisters, brothers-in-law, sisters-in-law, aunts, uncles, nieces, nephews, and first cousins. (AAA) "First cousin" means the child of a parent's sibling. Sec. 921.06. (A)(1) No individual shall do any of the following without having a commercial applicator license issued by the director of agriculture: (a) Apply pesticides for a pesticide business without direct supervision; (b) Apply pesticides as part of the individual's duties while acting as an employee of the United States government, a state, county, township, or municipal corporation, or a park district, port authority, or sanitary district created under Chapter 1545., 4582., or 6115. of the Revised Code, respectively; (c) Apply restricted use pesticides. Division (A)(1)(c) of this section does not apply to a private applicator or an immediate family member or a subordinate employee of a private applicator who is trained in accordance with standards prescribed by the director under section 921.16 of the Revised Code and who is acting under the direct supervision of that private applicator. (d) If the individual is the owner of a business other than a pesticide business or an employee of such an owner, apply pesticides at any of the following publicly accessible sites that are located on the property: (i) Food service operations that are licensed under Chapter 3717. of the Revised Code; (ii) Retail food establishments that are licensed under Chapter 3717. of the Revised Code; (iii) Golf courses; (iv) Rental properties of more than four apartment units at one location; (v) Hospitals or medical facilities as defined in section 3701.01 of the Revised Code; (vi) Child care centers or licensed school child programs as defined in section 5104.01 of the Revised Code; (vii) Facilities owned or operated by a school district established under Chapter 3311. of the Revised Code, including an educational service center, a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, or a chartered or nonchartered nonpublic school that meets minimum standards established by the director of education and workforce; (viii) State institutions of higher education as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code, nonprofit institutions holding a certificate of authorization pursuant to Chapter 1713. of the Revised Code, institutions holding a certificate of registration from the state board of career colleges and schools and program authorization for an associate or bachelor's degree program issued under section 3332.05 of the Revised Code, and private institutions exempt from regulation under Chapter 3332. of the Revised Code as prescribed in section 3333.046 of the Revised Code; (ix) Food processing establishments as defined in section 3715.021 of the Revised Code; (x) Any other site designated by rule. (e) Conduct authorized diagnostic inspections. (2) Divisions (A)(1)(a) to (d) of this section do not apply to an individual who is acting as a trained serviceperson under the direct supervision of a commercial applicator. (3) Licenses shall be issued for a period of time established by rule and shall be renewed in accordance with deadlines established by rule. The fee for each such license shall be established by rule. If a license is not issued or renewed, the application fee shall be retained by the state as payment for the reasonable expense of processing the application. The director shall by rule classify by pesticide-use category licenses to be issued under this section. A single license may include more than one pesticide-use category. No individual shall be required to pay an additional license fee if the individual is licensed for more than one category. The fee for each license or renewal does not apply to an applicant who is an employee of the department of agriculture whose job duties require licensure as a commercial applicator as a condition of employment. (B) Application for a commercial applicator license shall be made on a form prescribed by the director. Each application for a license shall state the pesticide-use category or categories of license for which the applicant is applying and other information that the director determines essential to the administration of this chapter. (C)(1) Except as provided in division (C)(2) of this section, if the director finds that the applicant is competent to apply pesticides and conduct diagnostic inspections and that the applicant has passed both the general examination and each applicable pesticide-use category examination as required under division (A) of section 921.12 of the Revised Code, the director shall issue a commercial applicator license limited to the pesticide-use category or categories for which the applicant is found to be competent. If the director rejects an application, the director may explain why the application was rejected, describe the additional requirements necessary for the applicant to obtain a license, and return the application. The applicant may resubmit the application without payment of any additional fee. (2) The director shall issue a commercial applicator license in accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code to an individual if either of the following applies: (a) The individual holds a commercial applicator license in another state. (b) The individual has satisfactory work experience, a government certification, or a private certification as described in that chapter as a commercial applicator in a state that does not issue that license. A license issued under this division shall be limited to the pesticide-use category or categories for which the applicant is licensed in another state or has satisfactory work experience, a government certification, or a private certification in that state. (D)(1) A person who is a commercial applicator shall be deemed to hold a private applicator's license for purposes of applying pesticides on agricultural commodities that are produced by the commercial applicator. (2) A commercial applicator shall apply pesticides only in the pesticide-use category or categories in which the applicator is licensed under this chapter. (E) All money collected under this section shall be credited to the pesticide, fertilizer, and lime program fund created in section 921.22 of the Revised Code. Sec. 921.11. (A) As used in this section, "use" means any of the following: (1) Performing pre-application activities involving mixing and loading the pesticide; (2) Applying the pesticide by a commercial applicator or private applicator, including supervising the use of a pesticide by a noncertified applicator; (3) Performing other pesticide-related activities, including transporting or storing pesticide containers that have been opened, cleaning equipment, and disposing of excess pesticides, spray mix, equipment wash waters, pesticide containers, and other pesticide-containing materials. (B) No individual shall use restricted use pesticides unless the individual is one of the following: (1) Licensed under section 921.06 of the Revised Code; (2) Licensed under division (C)(D) of this section; (3) A trained serviceperson who is trained in accordance with standards prescribed by the director under section 921.16 of the Revised Code and who is acting under the direct supervision of a commercial applicator; (4) An immediate family member or a subordinate employee of a private applicator who is trained in accordance with standards prescribed by the director under section 921.16 of the Revised Code and who is acting under the direct supervision of that private applicator. (C)(1) Subject to division (C)(2)(C) No individual shall directly supervise the application of a restricted use pesticide unless the individual is one of the following: (1) Licensed under section 921.06 of the Revised Code; (2) Licensed under division (D) of this section. (D)(1) Subject to division (D)(2) of this section, the director of agriculture shall adopt rules to establish standards and procedures for the licensure of private applicators. An individual shall apply for a private applicator license to the director, on forms prescribed by the director. The individual shall include in the application the pesticide-use category or categories of the license for which the individual is applying and any other information that the director determines is essential to the administration of this chapter. The fee for each license shall be established by rule. Licenses shall be issued for a period of time established by rule and shall be renewed in accordance with deadlines established by rule. If a license is not issued or renewed, the state shall retain any fee submitted as payment for reasonable expenses of processing the application. (2) The director shall issue a private applicator license in accordance with Chapter 4796. of the Revised Code to an individual if either of the following applies: (a) The individual holds a private applicator license in another state. (b) The individual has satisfactory work experience, a government certification, or a private certification as described in that chapter as a private applicator in a state that does not issue that license. A license issued under this division shall be limited to the pesticide-use category or categories for which the applicant is licensed in another state or has satisfactory work experience, a government certification, or a private certification in that state. (D)(E) An individual who is licensed under this section shall use or directly supervise the use of a restricted use pesticide only for the purpose of producing agricultural commodities on property that is owned or rented by the individual or the individual's employer. (E)(F) All money collected under this section shall be credited to the pesticide, fertilizer, and lime program fund created in section 921.22 of the Revised Code. Sec. 921.16. (A) The director of agriculture shall adopt rules the director determines necessary for the effective enforcement and administration of this chapter. The rules may relate to, but are not limited to, the time, place, manner, and methods of application, materials, and amounts and concentrations of application of pesticides, may restrict or prohibit the use of pesticides in designated areas during specified periods of time, and shall encompass all reasonable factors that the director determines necessary to minimize or prevent damage to the environment. In addition, the rules shall establish the deadlines and time periods for registration, registration renewal, late registration renewal, and failure to register under section 921.02 of the Revised Code; the fees for registration, registration renewal, late registration renewal, and failure to register under section 921.02 of the Revised Code that shall apply until the fees that are established under that section take effect on January 1, 2007; and the fees, deadlines, and time periods for licensure and license renewal under sections 921.06, 921.09, 921.11, and 921.13 of the Revised Code. (B) The director shall adopt rules that establish a schedule of civil penalties for violations of this chapter, or any rule or order adopted or issued under it, provided that the civil penalty for a first violation shall not exceed five thousand dollars and the civil penalty for each subsequent violation shall not exceed ten thousand dollars. In determining the amount of a civil penalty for a violation, the director shall consider factors relevant to the severity of the violation, including past violations and the amount of actual or potential damage to the environment or to human beings. All money collected under this division shall be credited to the pesticide, fertilizer, and lime program fund created in section 921.22 of the Revised Code. (C) The director shall adopt rules that set forth the conditions under which the director: (1) Requires that notice or posting be given of a proposed application of a pesticide; (2) Requires inspection, condemnation, or repair of equipment used to apply a pesticide; (3) Will suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue any pesticide registration for a violation of this chapter; (4) Requires safe handling, transportation, storage, display, distribution, and disposal of pesticides and their containers; (5) Ensures the protection of the health and safety of agricultural workers storing, handling, or applying pesticides, and all residents of agricultural labor camps, as that term is defined in section 3733.41 of the Revised Code, who are living or working in the vicinity of pesticide-treated areas; (6) Requires a record to be kept of all pesticide applications made by each commercial applicator and of all general use applications made by any trained serviceperson acting under the commercial applicator's direct supervision and of all restricted use pesticide applications made by each private applicator and by any immediate family member or subordinate employee of that private applicator who is acting under the private applicator's direct supervision as required under section 921.14 of the Revised Code; (7) Determines the pesticide-use categories of diagnostic inspections that must be conducted by a commercial applicator; (8) Requires a record to be kept of all diagnostic inspections conducted by each commercial applicator and by any trained service person. (D) The director shall prescribe standards for the licensure of applicators of pesticides and the training of those supervised by commercial applicators or private applicators in the use of restricted use pesticides consistent with those prescribed by the federal act and the regulations adopted under it or prescribe standards that are more restrictive than those prescribed by the federal act and the regulations adopted under it. The standards may relate to the use of a pesticide or to an individual's pesticide-use category. The director shall take into consideration standards of the United States environmental protection agency. (E) The director may adopt rules setting forth the conditions under which the director will: (1) Collect and examine samples of pesticides or devices; (2) Specify classes of devices that shall be subject to this chapter; (3) Prescribe other necessary registration information. (F) The director may adopt rules that do either or both of the following: (1) Designate, in addition to those restricted uses so classified by the administrator of the United States environmental protection agency, restricted uses of pesticides for the state or for designated areas within the state and, if the director considers it necessary, to further restrict such use; (2) Define what constitutes "acting under the instructions and control of a commercial applicator" as used in the definition of "direct supervision" in division (Q) of section 921.01 of the Revised Code. In adopting a rule under division (F)(2) of this section, the director shall consider the factors associated with the use of pesticide in the various pesticide-use categories. Based on consideration of the factors, the director may define "acting under the instructions and control of a commercial applicator" to include communications between a commercial applicator and a trained serviceperson that are conducted via landline telephone or a means of wireless communication. Any rules adopted under division (F)(2) of this section shall be drafted in consultation with representatives of the pesticide industry. (G) Except as provided in division (D) of this section, the director shall not adopt any rule under this chapter that is inconsistent with the requirements of the federal act and regulations adopted thereunder. (H) The director, after notice and opportunity for hearing, may declare as a pest any form of plant or animal life, other than human beings and other than bacteria, viruses, and other microorganisms on or in living human beings or other living animals, that is injurious to health or the environment. (I) The director may make reports to the United States environmental protection agency, in the form and containing the information the agency may require. (J) The director shall adopt rules for the application, use, storage, and disposal of pesticides if, in the director's judgment, existing programs of the United States environmental protection agency necessitate such rules or pesticide labels do not sufficiently address issues or situations identified by the department of agriculture or interested state agencies. (K) The director shall adopt rules establishing all of the following: (1) Standards, requirements, and procedures for the examination and re-examination of commercial applicators and private applicators; (2) With respect to training programs that the director may require commercial applicators and private applicators to complete: (a) Standards and requirements that a training program must satisfy in order to be offered by the director or the director's representative or in order to be approved by the director if a third party wishes to offer it; (b) Eligibility standards and requirements that must be satisfied by third parties who wish to provide the training programs; (c) Procedures that third parties must follow in order to submit a proposed training program to the director for approval; (d) Criteria that the director must consider when determining whether to authorize a commercial applicator or private applicator to participate in a training program instead of being required to pass a re-examination. (3) Training requirements for a trained serviceperson. (L) The director shall adopt all rules under this chapter in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. Sec. 921.24. No person shall do any of the following: (A) Apply, use, directly supervise such application or use, or recommend a pesticide for use inconsistent with the pesticide's labeling, treatment standards, or other restrictions imposed by the director of agriculture; (B) Act as a commercial applicator without being licensed to do so; (C) Use any restricted use pesticide, unless the person is licensed one of the following: (1) Licensed to do so under this chapter; (2) A trained serviceperson who is trained in accordance with standards prescribed by the director under section 921.16 of the Revised Code and who is acting under the direct supervision of a commercial applicator; (3) An immediate family member or a subordinate employee of a private applicator who is trained in accordance with standards prescribed by the director under section 921.16 of the Revised Code and who is acting under the direct supervision of that private applicator. (D) Refuse or fail to keep or maintain records required by the director in rules adopted under this chapter, or to make reports when and as required by the director in rules adopted under this chapter; (E) Falsely or fraudulently represent the effect of pesticides or methods to be utilized; (F) Apply known ineffective or improper materials; (G) Operate in a negligent manner, which includes the operation of faulty or unsafe equipment; (H) Impersonate any federal, state, county, or municipal official; (I) Make false or fraudulent records, invoices, or reports; (J) Fail to provide training to trained servicepersons in the application of general use or restricted use pesticides, as applicable; (K) Fail to provide direct supervision as specified in rules adopted under division (C) of section 921.16 of the Revised Code; (L) Distribute a misbranded or adulterated pesticide; (M) Use fraud or misrepresentation in making application for a license or registration or renewal of a license or registration; (N) Refuse, fail, or neglect to comply with any limitation or restriction of a license or registration issued under this chapter or rules adopted thereunder; (O) Aid or abet a licensee or another person in violating this chapter or rules adopted thereunder; (P) Make a false or misleading statement in an inspection concerning any infestation of pests or the use of pesticides; (Q) Refuse or fail to comply with this chapter, the rules adopted thereunder, or any lawful order of the director; (R) Distribute restricted use pesticides to the ultimate user without a pesticide dealer's license; (S) Except as provided in division (F) of section 921.26 of the Revised Code, distribute restricted use pesticides to an ultimate user who is not licensed under section 921.06 or 921.11 of the Revised Code and rules adopted under this chapter; (T) Use any pesticide that is under an experimental use permit contrary to the provisions of the permit; (U) Engage in fraudulent business practices; (V) Dispose of any pesticide product or container in such a manner as to have unreasonable adverse effects on the environment; (W) Display any pesticide in any manner to produce unreasonable adverse effects on the environment, or to contaminate adjacent food, feed, or other products; (X) Apply any pesticide by aircraft without being licensed as a commercial applicator; (Y) Distribute a pesticide that is not registered with the director; (Z) Fail to properly supervise a trained serviceperson. Sec. 943.26. The animal and consumer protection fund is created in the state treasury. The fund shall consist of livestock dealer or broker fees and civil penalties collected under this chapter, all money collected through the issuance of licenses to captive whitetail deer licensees under this chapter and any other money credited to it under the Revised Code. The director of agriculture shall use money in the fund to administer sections 943.20 to 943.26 of the Revised Code this chapter and rules and Chapters 904., 935., and 942. of the Revised Code and rules adopted under those chapters. Sec. 3313.8110. (A) The board of education of each city, exempted village, local, and joint vocational school district shall adopt a policy to prevent the purchase of a food that is either of the following: (1) Misbranded as a meat product or an egg product as prohibited in section 3715.602 of the Revised Code; (2) A cultivated-protein food product as defined in section 3715.601 of the Revised Code. (B) The department of education and workforce shall adopt a policy to prevent the purchase of a food that is either of the following: (1) Misbranded as a meat product or an egg product as prohibited in section 3715.602 of the Revised Code; (2) A cultivated-protein food product. Sec. 3314.03. A copy of every contract entered into under this section shall be filed with the director of education and workforce. The department of education and workforce shall make available on its web site a copy of every approved, executed contract filed with the director under this section. (A) Each contract entered into between a sponsor and the governing authority of a community school shall specify the following: (1) That the school shall be established as either of the following: (a) A nonprofit corporation established under Chapter 1702. of the Revised Code, if established prior to April 8, 2003; (b) A public benefit corporation established under Chapter 1702. of the Revised Code, if established after April 8, 2003. (2) The education program of the school, including the school's mission, the characteristics of the students the school is expected to attract, the ages and grades of students, and the focus of the curriculum; (3) The academic goals to be achieved and the method of measurement that will be used to determine progress toward those goals, which shall include the statewide achievement assessments; (4) Performance standards, including but not limited to all applicable report card measures set forth in section 3302.03 or 3314.017 of the Revised Code, by which the success of the school will be evaluated by the sponsor; (5) The admission standards of section 3314.06 of the Revised Code and, if applicable, section 3314.061 of the Revised Code; (6)(a) Dismissal procedures; (b) A requirement that the governing authority adopt an attendance policy that includes a procedure for automatically withdrawing a student from the school if the student without a legitimate excuse fails to participate in seventy-two consecutive hours of the learning opportunities offered to the student. (7) The ways by which the school will achieve racial and ethnic balance reflective of the community it serves; (8) Requirements for financial audits by the auditor of state. The contract shall require financial records of the school to be maintained in the same manner as are financial records of school districts, pursuant to rules of the auditor of state. Audits shall be conducted in accordance with section 117.10 of the Revised Code. (9) An addendum to the contract outlining the facilities to be used that contains at least the following information: (a) A detailed description of each facility used for instructional purposes; (b) The annual costs associated with leasing each facility that are paid by or on behalf of the school; (c) The annual mortgage principal and interest payments that are paid by the school; (d) The name of the lender or landlord, identified as such, and the lender's or landlord's relationship to the operator, if any. (10) Qualifications of employees, including both of the following: (a) A requirement that the school's classroom teachers be licensed in accordance with sections 3319.22 to 3319.31 of the Revised Code, except that a community school may engage noncertificated persons to teach up to twelve hours or forty hours per week pursuant to section 3319.301 of the Revised Code; (b) A prohibition against the school employing an individual described in section 3314.104 of the Revised Code in any position. (11) That the school will comply with the following requirements: (a) The school will provide learning opportunities to a minimum of twenty-five students for a minimum of nine hundred twenty hours per school year. (b) The governing authority will purchase liability insurance, or otherwise provide for the potential liability of the school. (c) The school will be nonsectarian in its programs, admission policies, employment practices, and all other operations, and will not be operated by a sectarian school or religious institution. (d) The school will comply with sections 9.90, 9.91, 109.65, 121.22, 149.43, 2151.357, 2151.421, 2313.19, 3301.0710, 3301.0711, 3301.0712, 3301.0715, 3301.0729, 3301.948, 3302.037, 3313.472, 3313.50, 3313.539, 3313.5310, 3313.5318, 3313.5319, 3313.608, 3313.609, 3313.6012, 3313.6013, 3313.6014, 3313.6020, 3313.6024, 3313.6025, 3313.6026, 3313.6028, 3313.6029, 3313.643, 3313.648, 3313.6411, 3313.6413, 3313.66, 3313.661, 3313.662, 3313.666, 3313.667, 3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.67, 3313.671, 3313.672, 3313.673, 3313.69, 3313.71, 3313.716, 3313.718, 3313.719, 3313.7112, 3313.7117, 3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.80, 3313.814, 3313.816, 3313.817, 3313.818, 3313.819, 3313.8110, 3313.86, 3313.89, 3313.96, 3319.073, 3319.077, 3319.078, 3319.0812, 3319.238, 3319.318, 3319.321, 3319.324, 3319.39, 3319.391, 3319.393, 3319.41, 3319.46, 3319.614, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 3321.01, 3321.041, 3321.13, 3321.14, 3321.141, 3321.17, 3321.18, 3321.19, 3322.20, 3322.24, 3323.251, 3327.10, 4111.17, 4113.52, 5502.262, 5502.703, and 5705.391 and Chapters 117., 1347., 2744., 3365., 3742., 4112., 4123., 4141., and 4167. of the Revised Code as if it were a school district and will comply with section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code in the manner specified in section 3314.17 of the Revised Code. (e) The school shall comply with Chapter 102. and section 2921.42 of the Revised Code. (f) The school will comply with sections 3313.61, 3313.611, 3313.614, 3313.617, 3313.618, and 3313.6114 of the Revised Code, except that for students who enter ninth grade for the first time before July 1, 2010, the requirement in sections 3313.61 and 3313.611 of the Revised Code that a person must successfully complete the curriculum in any high school prior to receiving a high school diploma may be met by completing the curriculum adopted by the governing authority of the community school rather than the curriculum specified in Title XXXIII of the Revised Code or any rules of the department. Beginning with students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after July 1, 2010, the requirement in sections 3313.61 and 3313.611 of the Revised Code that a person must successfully complete the curriculum of a high school prior to receiving a high school diploma shall be met by completing the requirements prescribed in section 3313.6027 and division (C) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code, unless the person qualifies under division (D) or (F) of that section. Each school shall comply with the plan for awarding high school credit based on demonstration of subject area competency, and beginning with the 2017-2018 school year, with the updated plan that permits students enrolled in seventh and eighth grade to meet curriculum requirements based on subject area competency adopted by the department under divisions (J)(1) and (2) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code. Beginning with the 2018-2019 school year, the school shall comply with the framework for granting units of high school credit to students who demonstrate subject area competency through work-based learning experiences, internships, or cooperative education developed by the department under division (J)(3) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code. (g) The school governing authority will submit within four months after the end of each school year a report of its activities and progress in meeting the goals and standards of divisions (A)(3) and (4) of this section and its financial status to the sponsor and the parents of all students enrolled in the school. (h) The school, unless it is an internet- or computer-based community school, will comply with section 3313.801 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district. (i) If the school is the recipient of moneys from a grant awarded under the federal race to the top program, Division (A), Title XIV, Sections 14005 and 14006 of the "American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009," Pub. L. No. 111-5, 123 Stat. 115, the school will pay teachers based upon performance in accordance with section 3317.141 and will comply with section 3319.111 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district. (j) If the school operates a preschool program that is licensed by the department under sections 3301.52 to 3301.59 of the Revised Code, the school shall comply with sections 3301.50 to 3301.59 of the Revised Code and the minimum standards for preschool programs prescribed in rules adopted by the department of children and youth under section 3301.53 of the Revised Code. (k) The school will comply with sections 3313.6021 and 3313.6023 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district unless it is either of the following: (i) An internet- or computer-based community school; (ii) A community school in which a majority of the enrolled students are children with disabilities as described in division (B)(2) of section 3314.35 of the Revised Code. (l) The school will comply with section 3321.191 of the Revised Code, unless it is an internet- or computer-based community school that is subject to section 3314.261 of the Revised Code. (12) Arrangements for providing health and other benefits to employees; (13) The length of the contract, which shall begin at the beginning of an academic year. No contract shall exceed five years unless such contract has been renewed pursuant to division (E) of this section. (14) The governing authority of the school, which shall be responsible for carrying out the provisions of the contract; (15) A financial plan detailing an estimated school budget for each year of the period of the contract and specifying the total estimated per pupil expenditure amount for each such year. (16) Requirements and procedures regarding the disposition of employees of the school in the event the contract is terminated or not renewed pursuant to section 3314.07 of the Revised Code; (17) Whether the school is to be created by converting all or part of an existing public school or educational service center building or is to be a new start-up school, and if it is a converted public school or service center building, specification of any duties or responsibilities of an employer that the board of education or service center governing board that operated the school or building before conversion is delegating to the governing authority of the community school with respect to all or any specified group of employees provided the delegation is not prohibited by a collective bargaining agreement applicable to such employees; (18) Provisions establishing procedures for resolving disputes or differences of opinion between the sponsor and the governing authority of the community school; (19) A provision requiring the governing authority to adopt a policy regarding the admission of students who reside outside the district in which the school is located. That policy shall comply with the admissions procedures specified in sections 3314.06 and 3314.061 of the Revised Code and, at the sole discretion of the authority, shall do one of the following: (a) Prohibit the enrollment of students who reside outside the district in which the school is located; (b) Permit the enrollment of students who reside in districts adjacent to the district in which the school is located; (c) Permit the enrollment of students who reside in any other district in the state. (20) A provision recognizing the authority of the department to take over the sponsorship of the school in accordance with the provisions of division (C) of section 3314.015 of the Revised Code; (21) A provision recognizing the sponsor's authority to assume the operation of a school under the conditions specified in division (B) of section 3314.073 of the Revised Code; (22) A provision recognizing both of the following: (a) The authority of public health and safety officials to inspect the facilities of the school and to order the facilities closed if those officials find that the facilities are not in compliance with health and safety laws and regulations; (b) The authority of the department as the community school oversight body to suspend the operation of the school under section 3314.072 of the Revised Code if the department has evidence of conditions or violations of law at the school that pose an imminent danger to the health and safety of the school's students and employees and the sponsor refuses to take such action. (23) A description of the learning opportunities that will be offered to students including both classroom-based and non-classroom-based learning opportunities that is in compliance with criteria for student participation established by the department under division (H)(2) of section 3314.08 of the Revised Code; (24) The school will comply with sections 3302.04 and 3302.041 of the Revised Code, except that any action required to be taken by a school district pursuant to those sections shall be taken by the sponsor of the school. (25) Beginning in the 2006-2007 school year, the school will open for operation not later than the thirtieth day of September each school year, unless the mission of the school as specified under division (A)(2) of this section is solely to serve dropouts. In its initial year of operation, if the school fails to open by the thirtieth day of September, or within one year after the adoption of the contract pursuant to division (D) of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code if the mission of the school is solely to serve dropouts, the contract shall be void. (26) Whether the school's governing authority is planning to seek designation for the school as a STEM school equivalent under section 3326.032 of the Revised Code; (27) That the school's attendance and participation policies will be available for public inspection; (28) That the school's attendance and participation records shall be made available to the department, auditor of state, and school's sponsor to the extent permitted under and in accordance with the "Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974," 88 Stat. 571, 20 U.S.C. 1232g, as amended, and any regulations promulgated under that act, and section 3319.321 of the Revised Code; (29) If a school operates using the blended learning model, as defined in section 3301.079 of the Revised Code, all of the following information: (a) An indication of what blended learning model or models will be used; (b) A description of how student instructional needs will be determined and documented; (c) The method to be used for determining competency, granting credit, and promoting students to a higher grade level; (d) The school's attendance requirements, including how the school will document participation in learning opportunities; (e) A statement describing how student progress will be monitored; (f) A statement describing how private student data will be protected; (g) A description of the professional development activities that will be offered to teachers. (30) A provision requiring that all moneys the school's operator loans to the school, including facilities loans or cash flow assistance, must be accounted for, documented, and bear interest at a fair market rate; (31) A provision requiring that, if the governing authority contracts with an attorney, accountant, or entity specializing in audits, the attorney, accountant, or entity shall be independent from the operator with which the school has contracted. (32) A provision requiring the governing authority to adopt an enrollment and attendance policy that requires a student's parent to notify the community school in which the student is enrolled when there is a change in the location of the parent's or student's primary residence. (33) A provision requiring the governing authority to adopt a student residence and address verification policy for students enrolling in or attending the school. (B) The community school shall also submit to the sponsor a comprehensive plan for the school. The plan shall specify the following: (1) The process by which the governing authority of the school will be selected in the future; (2) The management and administration of the school; (3) If the community school is a currently existing public school or educational service center building, alternative arrangements for current public school students who choose not to attend the converted school and for teachers who choose not to teach in the school or building after conversion; (4) The instructional program and educational philosophy of the school; (5) Internal financial controls. When submitting the plan under this division, the school shall also submit copies of all policies and procedures regarding internal financial controls adopted by the governing authority of the school. (C) A contract entered into under section 3314.02 of the Revised Code between a sponsor and the governing authority of a community school may provide for the community school governing authority to make payments to the sponsor, which is hereby authorized to receive such payments as set forth in the contract between the governing authority and the sponsor. The total amount of such payments for monitoring, oversight, and technical assistance of the school shall not exceed three per cent of the total amount of payments for operating expenses that the school receives from the state. (D) The contract shall specify the duties of the sponsor which shall be in accordance with the written agreement entered into with the department under division (B) of section 3314.015 of the Revised Code and shall include the following: (1) Monitor the community school's compliance with all laws applicable to the school and with the terms of the contract; (2) Monitor and evaluate the academic and fiscal performance and the organization and operation of the community school on at least an annual basis; (3) Provide technical assistance to the community school in complying with laws applicable to the school and terms of the contract; (4) Take steps to intervene in the school's operation to correct problems in the school's overall performance, declare the school to be on probationary status pursuant to section 3314.073 of the Revised Code, suspend the operation of the school pursuant to section 3314.072 of the Revised Code, or terminate the contract of the school pursuant to section 3314.07 of the Revised Code as determined necessary by the sponsor; (5) Have in place a plan of action to be undertaken in the event the community school experiences financial difficulties or closes prior to the end of a school year. (E) Upon the expiration of a contract entered into under this section, the sponsor of a community school may, with the approval of the governing authority of the school, renew that contract for a period of time determined by the sponsor, but not ending earlier than the end of any school year, if the sponsor finds that the school's compliance with applicable laws and terms of the contract and the school's progress in meeting the academic goals prescribed in the contract have been satisfactory. Any contract that is renewed under this division remains subject to the provisions of sections 3314.07, 3314.072, and 3314.073 of the Revised Code. (F) If a community school fails to open for operation within one year after the contract entered into under this section is adopted pursuant to division (D) of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code or permanently closes prior to the expiration of the contract, the contract shall be void and the school shall not enter into a contract with any other sponsor. A school shall not be considered permanently closed because the operations of the school have been suspended pursuant to section 3314.072 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3326.11. Each science, technology, engineering, and mathematics school established under this chapter and its governing body shall comply with sections 9.90, 9.91, 109.65, 121.22, 149.43, 2151.357, 2151.421, 2313.19, 2921.42, 2921.43, 3301.0714, 3301.0715, 3301.0729, 3301.948, 3302.037, 3313.14, 3313.15, 3313.16, 3313.18, 3313.201, 3313.26, 3313.472, 3313.48, 3313.481, 3313.482, 3313.50, 3313.539, 3313.5310, 3313.5318, 3313.5319, 3313.608, 3313.6012, 3313.6013, 3313.6014, 3313.6020, 3313.6021, 3313.6023, 3313.6024, 3313.6025, 3313.6026, 3313.6028, 3313.6029, 3313.61, 3313.611, 3313.614, 3313.615, 3313.617, 3313.618, 3313.6114, 3313.643, 3313.648, 3313.6411, 3313.6413, 3313.66, 3313.661, 3313.662, 3313.666, 3313.667, 3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.67, 3313.671, 3313.672, 3313.673, 3313.69, 3313.71, 3313.716, 3313.717, 3313.718, 3313.719, 3313.7112, 3313.7117, 3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.80, 3313.801, 3313.814, 3313.816, 3313.817, 3313.818, 3313.819, 3313.8110, 3313.86, 3313.89, 3313.96, 3319.073, 3319.077, 3319.078, 3319.0812, 3319.21, 3319.238, 3319.318, 3319.32, 3319.321, 3319.324, 3319.35, 3319.39, 3319.391, 3319.393, 3319.41, 3319.45, 3319.46, 3319.614, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 3321.01, 3321.041, 3321.05, 3321.13, 3321.14, 3321.141, 3321.17, 3321.18, 3321.19, 3321.191, 3322.20, 3322.24, 3323.251, 3327.10, 4111.17, 4113.52, 5502.262, 5502.703, and 5705.391 and Chapters 102., 117., 1347., 2744., 3307., 3309., 3365., 3742., 4112., 4123., 4141., and 4167. of the Revised Code as if it were a school district. Sec. 3328.24. A college-preparatory boarding school established under this chapter and its board of trustees shall comply with sections 102.02, 3301.0710, 3301.0711, 3301.0712, 3301.0714, 3301.0729, 3301.948, 3302.037, 3313.5318, 3313.5319, 3313.6013, 3313.6021, 3313.6023, 3313.6024, 3313.6025, 3313.6026, 3313.6029, 3313.617, 3313.618, 3313.6114, 3313.6411, 3313.6413, 3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.717, 3313.7112, 3313.7117, 3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.8110, 3313.89, 3319.073, 3319.077, 3319.078, 3319.318, 3319.324, 3319.39, 3319.391, 3319.393, 3319.46, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 3323.251, and 5502.262, and Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code as if the school were a school district and the school's board of trustees were a district board of education. Sec. 3345.88. Each state institution of higher education, as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code, shall adopt a policy to prevent the purchase of a food that is either of the following: (A) Misbranded as a meat product or an egg product as prohibited in section 3715.602 of the Revised Code; (B) A cultivated-protein food product as defined in section 3715.601 of the Revised Code. This section does not apply to a state institution's purchase of food described in divisions (A) and (B) of this section for research purposes. Sec. 3701.132. (A) As used in this section, "WIC program" means the "special supplemental nutrition program for women, infants, and children" established under the "Child Nutrition Act of 1966," 80 Stat. 885, 42 U.S.C. 1786, as amended. (B) The department of health is hereby designated as the state agency to administer the WIC program. The director of health shall adopt rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code as necessary for administering the WIC program. The rules may include civil money penalties for violations of the rules. (C) In determining eligibility for services provided under the WIC program, the department may use the application form established under section 5163.40 of the Revised Code for the healthy start program. The department may require applicants to furnish their social security numbers. (D) If the department determines that a vendor has committed an act with respect to the WIC program that federal statutes or regulations or state statutes or rules prohibit, the department shall take action against the vendor in the manner required by 7 C.F.R. part 246, including imposition of a civil money penalty in accordance with 7 C.F.R. 246.12, or rules adopted under this section. (E) If the United States department of agriculture approves cultivated-protein food products as defined in section 3715.601 of the Revised Code for purchase under the WIC program, the director of health shall submit a request to the United States department of agriculture for a waiver that excludes those products from program eligibility in this state. Sec. 3715.60. Food In addition to the specifications established in section 3715.602 of the Revised Code, food is misbranded within the meaning of sections 3715.01, 3715.02, 3715.022, and 3715.52 to 3715.72 of the Revised Code, if: (A) Its labeling is false or misleading in any particular. (B) It is offered for sale under the name of another food. (C) Its container is so made, formed, or filled as to be misleading. (D) It is an imitation of another food, unless its label bears in type of uniform size and prominence, the word "imitation," and immediately thereafter the name of the food imitated. (E) When it is in package form, it does not bear a label containing: (1) The name and place of business of the manufacturer, packer, or distributor; (2) An accurate statement of the quantity of the contents in terms of weight, measure, or numerical count; provided, that reasonable variations shall be permitted, and exemptions as to small packages shall be established by rules adopted by the director of agriculture; (3) In the case of food subject to section 3715.023 of the Revised Code, the information specified in that section. (F) Any word, statement, or other information required by or under authority of sections 3715.01, 3715.02, and 3715.52 to 3715.72 of the Revised Code, to appear on the label or labeling is not prominently placed thereon with such conspicuousness as compared with other words, statements, designs, or devices, in the labeling, and in such terms as to render it likely to be read and understood by the ordinary individual under customary conditions of purchase and use. (G) It purports to be, or is represented as, a food for which a definition and standard of identity have been prescribed by statute, or by any rule adopted under an existing statute, or by rule as provided by section 3715.02 of the Revised Code, unless: (1) It conforms to such definition and standard. (2) Its label bears the name of the food specified in the definition and standard, and, insofar as may be required by such statute or rules, the common names of optional ingredients, other than spices, flavoring, and coloring, present in such food. (H) It purports to be or is represented as: (1) A food for which a standard of quality has been prescribed by rule as provided by section 3715.02 of the Revised Code and its quality falls below the standard unless its label bears, in the manner and form that the rules specify, a statement that it falls below the standard; (2) A food for which a standard or standards of fill of container have been prescribed by rule as provided by section 3715.02 of the Revised Code, and it falls below the standard of fill of container applicable thereto, unless its label bears, in the manner and form that the rules specify, a statement that it falls below the standard. (I) It is not subject to the provisions of division (G) of this section, unless it bears labeling clearly giving: (1) The common or usual name of the food, if any; (2) In case it is fabricated from two or more ingredients, the common or usual name of each ingredient; except that spices, flavorings, and colorings, other than those sold as such, may be designated as spices, flavorings, and colorings, without naming each; provided, that, to the extent that compliance with the requirements of division (I)(2) of this section is impractical or results in deception or unfair competition, exemptions shall be established by rules adopted by the director; and provided that these requirements shall not apply to any carbonated beverage of which a full and correct statement of the ingredients, to the extent prescribed by division (I)(2) of this section, has been filed under oath with the director. (J) It purports to be or is represented to be for special dietary uses, unless its label bears such information concerning its vitamin, mineral, and other dietary properties as is provided by rules adopted by the director, as necessary, in order to fully inform purchasers as to its value for such uses. (K) It bears or contains any artificial flavoring, artificial coloring, or chemical preservative, unless it bears labeling stating that fact; provided, that to the extent that compliance with the requirements of this division is impracticable, exemptions shall be established by rules adopted by the director. Sec. 3715.601. As used in this section and sections 3715.602 to 3715.605 of the Revised Code: (A) "Agricultural food animal" means both of the following: (1) A domesticated animal belonging to the bovine, caprine, ovine, or porcine species; (2) Any type of poultry. (B) "Cultivated-protein food product" means a food having one or more sensory attributes that resemble a type of tissue originating from an agricultural food animal, but that, in lieu of being derived from meat processing, is derived from manufacturing cells in which one or more stem cells are initially isolated from an agricultural food animal, are grown in vitro, and may be manipulated, as part of a manufacturing operation. (C) "Egg" means food that is the reproductive output of an agricultural food animal classified as a chicken. "Egg" includes albumen and yolk encased in a calcium-based shell. (D) "Egg product" means food derived from egg processing in which eggs or egg parts are the primary ingredient. (E) "Egg processing" means the processing of eggs, including either of the following: (1) The handling, preparation, heating, and packaging of whole shelled or unshelled eggs; (2) The breaking of eggs and the separation of eggs; pasteurization; filtering, mixing, stabilizing, or blending parts of the egg; any cooling, freezing, or drying of parts of the egg; storage; and packaging. (F) "Fabricated-egg product" means food, if it has one or more sensory attributes that resemble an egg product but that, in lieu of being the output of a laying hen, is derived from manufactured plants or other organic materials. (G) "Food processing establishment" has the same meaning as in section 3715.021 of the Revised Code. (H) "Identifying egg term" means any word or phrase that states, indicates, suggests, or describes an egg product, regardless of whether the word or phrase is used individually, as a portmanteau, or as a compound word. "Identifying egg term" includes any of the following: (1) A common name for a type of a chicken, including laying hen, hen, or layer, cage-free, poultry, or fowl; (2) A common name for a characteristic of a chicken based on age, breed, or sex; (3) A common name, or a comparable word or phrase approved by the department of agriculture, that a reasonable purchaser would immediately and exclusively associate with an egg product prepared for sale in normal commercial channels such as custard, eggnog, frittata, huevos rancheros, omelette, mayonnaise, meringue, sunny side up, over easy, over hard, scrambled, or quiche; (4) Any part of the egg, including its egg, eggshell, egg white, or yolk. (I) "Identifying meat term" means any word or phrase that states, indicates, suggests, or describes a meat product, regardless of whether the word or phrase is used individually, as a portmanteau, or as a compound word. "Identifying meat term" includes any of the following: (1) A common name for the species of an agricultural food animal subject to slaughter and processing, including a calf or cow, goat or kid, hog or pig, poultry, or lamb or sheep; (2) A common name for a characteristic of a species of the agricultural food animal subject to slaughter and processing based on age, breed, or sex; (3) Meat, beef, or veal; broiler, fryer, poulet, or yearling; cabrito or chevon; lamb or mutton; or pork; (4) A common name used to describe a major cut of a meat of an agricultural food animal slaughtered and processed, including a major meat cut specified in 9 C.F.R. 317.344; a poultry product such as breast, drumstick, giblet, thigh, or wing; or the common name of an organ or offal, including gizzard, heart, liver, kidney, or tongue; (5) Any other common name that a reasonable purchaser would immediately and exclusively associate with a meat product prepared for sale in normal commercial channels such as chicken, bacon, baloney, bologna, bone, brat or bratwurst, brisket, burger or hamburger, butt, chop, chorizo, chuck, cold cut, cutlet, filet, flat iron, frank or frankfurter, ham, hock, hot dog or dog, jerky, liverwurst, loin, London broil, lunch meat, New York strip, pepperoni, porterhouse, ribeye, roast, rib or sparerib, salami, sausage, shank, sirloin, tenderloin, or a comparable word or phrase. (J) "Insect-protein food product" means a food having one or more sensory attributes that resemble a type of tissue originating from an agricultural food animal but that, in lieu of being derived from meat processing, is derived from manufacturing insect parts. (K) "Manufactured-protein food product" means a cultivated-protein food, insect-protein food, or plant-protein food. (L) "Meat processing" means the handling, preparation, and slaughter of an agricultural food animal; the dressing of its carcass; or the cutting, storage, and packaging of its tissue or other parts as a food. (M) "Meat product" means a food derived from meat processing. (N) "Plant-protein food product" means a food having one or more sensory attributes that resemble a type of tissue found in a species of agricultural food animal but that, in lieu of being derived from meat processing, is derived from manufacturing plant parts. (O) "Qualifying egg term" means a word, compound word, or phrase that would clearly disclose to a reasonable purchaser of egg products from a food processing establishment that a food product is not an egg product. "Qualifying egg term" includes fake, imitation, egg-free, plant, plant-based, vegan, vegetable, vegetarian, veggie, or a comparable word or phrase as approved by the department. (P) "Qualifying meat term" means a word, compound word, or phrase that would clearly disclose to a reasonable purchaser of meat products from a food processing establishment that a food is not a meat product. "Qualifying meat term" includes cell-cultivated, cell-cultured, fake, grown in a lab, imitation, insect, insect-based, insect-protein, lab-created, lab-grown, meat free, meatless, plant, plant-based, vegan, vegetable, vegetarian, veggie, or a comparable word or phrase as approved by the department. Sec. 3715.602. (A) Food is misbranded as a meat product if all of the following apply: (1) The food is a manufactured-protein food product or the food contains a manufactured-protein food product. (2) The food is offered for sale by a food processing establishment. (3) A label that is part of or placed on the package or other container storing the manufactured-protein food product includes an identifying meat term. (4) The label that is part of or placed on the package or other container storing the manufactured-protein food product does not contain a conspicuous and prominent qualifying meat term in close proximity to the identifying meat term. (B) Food is misbranded as an egg product if all of the following apply: (1) The food is a fabricated-egg product or the food contains a fabricated-egg product. (2) The food is offered for sale or sold by a food processing establishment. (3) A label that is part of or placed on the package or other container storing the food includes an identifying egg term. (4) The label that is part of or placed on the package or other container storing the food does not contain a conspicuous and prominent qualifying egg term in close proximity to an identifying egg term. (C) No food processing establishment shall sell food that is misbranded as a meat product or an egg product under this section. Sec. 3715.603. In conducting a routine inspection of the premises of a food processing establishment, the department of agriculture is not required to determine if any food located on the premises is misbranded as a meat product or an egg product pursuant to section 3715.602 of the Revised Code. The department shall inspect an inventory of food offered for sale or sold by a food processing establishment based on a credible complaint that the food is misbranded as a meat product or an egg product under section 3715.602 of the Revised Code. The department shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that are necessary to administer and enforce sections 3715.601 to 3715.605 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3715.604. If the department of agriculture has reasonable cause to believe that a food processing establishment is selling food that is misbranded as a meat product or an egg product in violation of section 3715.602 of the Revised Code, section 3715.55 of the Revised Code applies to the food. Sec. 3715.605. (A) Any person who violates section 3715.602 of the Revised Code shall pay a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars for each violation, to be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the general revenue fund. Each day that a violation continues constitutes a separate offense. The attorney general, upon written request by the director of agriculture, shall bring an action for such a penalty against any person who violates that section. Such an action is a civil action, governed by the Rules of Civil Procedure and other rules of practice and procedure applicable to civil actions. (B) The director shall not suspend or revoke a food processing establishment registration if the food processing establishment violates section 3715.602 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5101.5410. As used in this section, "cultivated-protein food product" has the same meaning as in section 3715.601 of the Revised Code. If the United States department of agriculture approves cultivated-protein food products for purchase under the supplemental nutrition assistance program, the director of job and family services shall submit a request to the United States department of agriculture for a waiver that excludes those products from program eligibility in this state. Section 2. That existing sections 909.07, 921.01, 921.06, 921.11, 921.16, 921.24, 943.26, 3314.03, 3326.11, 3328.24, 3701.132, and 3715.60 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. The General Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of simultaneous operation, finds that the following sections, presented in this act as composites of the sections as amended by the acts indicated, are the resulting versions of the sections in effect prior to the effective date of the sections as presented in this act: Section 3314.03 of the Revised Code as amended by H.B. 214, H.B. 250, and S.B. 168, all of the 135th General Assembly. Section 3326.11 of the Revised Code as amended by H.B. 47, H.B. 214, and S.B. 168, all of the 135th General Assembly. Section 3328.24 of the Revised Code as amended by both H.B. 47 and H.B. 214 of the 135th General Assembly. Speaker ___________________ of the House of Representatives. President ___________________ of the Senate. Passed ________________________, 20____ Approved ________________________, 20____ Governor. The section numbering of law of a general and permanent nature is complete and in conformity with the Revised Code. Director, Legislative Service Commission. Filed in the office of the Secretary of State at Columbus, Ohio, on the ____ day of ___________, A. D. 20____. Secretary of State. File No. _________	Effective Date ___________________